pl: Materiał izolacji rękawic: Kaszmir; Polar; Wełna merynosowa; Micro Bemberg; Brak; Wypełnienie z włókien syntetycznych; Thinsulate; Inne
ro-RO: Material izolator pentru îmbrăcăminte: Cașmir; Polar; Lână merinos; Micro Bemberg; Fără; Umplutură din fibre sintetice; Thinsulate; Altele
th: วัสดุฉนวนสำหรับถุงมือ: แคชเมียร์; ฟลีซ; ขนแกะเมอริโน; ไมโครเบมเบิร์ก; ไม่มี; เส้นใยสังเคราะห์; ทินซูเลท; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Izolačný materiál pokrývky rúk: Kašmír; Flís; Merino vlna; Mikro Bemberg; Žiadny; Výplň zo syntetických vláken; Thinsulate; Iné
ru: Материал утеплителя перчаток: Кашемир; Флис; Мериносовая шерсть; Микро-бемберг; Нет; Синтетический наполнитель; Тинсулейт; Другое
pt-BR: Material isolante das luvas: Cashmere; Fleece; Lã merino; Micro Bemberg; Nenhum; Enchimento de fibra sintética; Thinsulate; Outro
zh-CN: 手部保暖材质: 羊绒; 抓绒; 美利奴羊毛; 微纤维 Bemberg; 无; 合成纤维填充物; 新雪丽; 其他
ko: 장갑 절연 소재: 캐시미어; 플리스; 메리노 울; 마이크로 벰베르크; 없음; 합성 섬유 충전재; 신슐레이트; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на изолацията на ръкавиците: Кашмир; Полар; Мериносова вълна; Micro Bemberg; Няма; Пълнеж от синтетични влакна; Thinsulate; Друго
zh-TW: 手套保暖材質: 喀什米爾羊毛; 刷毛; 美麗諾羊毛; 超細賓霸 (Micro Bemberg); 無; 合成纖維填充; 新雪麗 (Thinsulate); 其他
hu: Kesztyű szigetelőanyag: Kasmír; Polár; Merinó gyapjú; Micro Bemberg; Nincs; Szintetikus száltöltet; Thinsulate; Egyéb
it: Materiale isolante per guanti: Cashmere; Pile; Lana merino; Micro Bemberg; Nessuno; Imbottitura in fibra sintetica; Thinsulate; Altro
es: Material aislante para guantes: Cachemira; Polar; Lana merino; Micro Bemberg; Ninguno; Relleno de fibra sintética; Thinsulate; Otro
tr: Eldiven yalıtım malzemesi: Kaşmir; Polar; Merinos yünü; Mikro Bemberg; Yok; Sentetik elyaf dolgu; Thinsulate; Diğer
sv: Isoleringsmaterial för handkläder: Kaschmir; Fleece; Merinoull; Micro Bemberg; Ingen; Syntetfiberfyllning; Thinsulate; Övrigt
nb: Håndisolasjonsmateriale: Kasjmir; Fleece; Merinoull; Micro Bemberg; Ingen; Syntetisk fiberfyll; Thinsulate; Annet
el: Θερμομονωτικό υλικό γαντιών: Κασμίρ; Φλις; Μαλλί μερινό; Micro Bemberg; Κανένα; Γέμισμα συνθετικών ινών; Thinsulate; Άλλο
da: Isoleringsmateriale i handsker: Kashmir; Fleece; Merinould; Micro Bemberg; Ingen; Syntetisk fiberfyld; Thinsulate; Andet
sl-SI: Izolacijski material rokavice: Kašmir; Flis; Merino volna; Mikro Bemberg; Brez; Polnilo iz sintetičnih vlaken; Thinsulate; Drugo
vi: Chất liệu cách nhiệt của găng tay: Cashmere; Vải nỉ lông; Len Merino; Micro Bemberg; Không có; Sợi tổng hợp; Thinsulate; Khác
fi: Käsineiden eristysmateriaali: Kashmir; Fleece; Merinovilla; Mikro-Bemberg; Ei mitään; Synteettinen kuitutäyte; Thinsulate; Muu
en: Handwear insulation material: Cashmere; Fleece; Merino wool; Micro Bemberg; None; Synthetic fiber fill; Thinsulate; Other
lt-LT: Rankų aprangos izoliacinė medžiaga: Kašmyras; Flisas; Merino vilna; „Micro Bemberg“; Nėra; Sintetinio pluošto užpildas; „Thinsulate“; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal za izolaciju ruku: Kašmir; Flis; Merino vuna; Micro Bemberg; Bez; Punjenje od sintetičkih vlakana; Thinsulate; Ostalo
de: Isoliermaterial der Handschuhe: Kaschmir; Fleece; Merinowolle; Micro Bemberg; Keine; Synthetikfaserfüllung; Thinsulate; Sonstige
pt-PT: material isolante para as mãos: Caxemira; Velo polar; Lã merino; Micro Bemberg; Nenhum; Enchimento de fibra sintética; Thinsulate; Outro
fr: Matériau isolant pour les mains: Cachemire; Polaire; Laine mérinos; Micro Bemberg; Aucun; Rembourrage en fibres synthétiques; Thinsulate; Autre
nl: Handmode isolatie materiaal: Kasjmier; Fleece; Merinowol; Micro Bemberg; Geen; Synthetische vezelvulling; Thinsulate; Overig
cs: Izolační materiál na ruce: Kašmír; Fleece; Merino vlna; Micro Bemberg; Žádný; Výplň ze syntetických vláken; Thinsulate; Jiný
ja: グローブ用断熱材: カシミヤ; フリース; メリノウール; マイクロベンベルグ; なし; 合成繊維中綿; シンサレート; その他